Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 1 Georgia State Indemnification Fund

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 3, designated Code Sections 45-9-80 through 45-9-91 of Article 5 as Part 1 of said Article, which became effective July 1, 2001, only upon ratification of a constitutional amendment by the voters of the state at the 2000 November general election. The constitutional amendment (Ga. L. 2000, p. 1999) was approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting at the general election held on November 7, 2000.

Law reviews.

For note on 2000 amendments of O.C.G.A. §§

45-9-80

to

45-9-91

, see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 270 (2000).

45-9-80.
[Reserved] Purpose of part.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1, effective July 1, 2008.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1, reenacted Article 5 and omitted Code Section 45-9-80. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, this Code section has been treated as repealed.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1978, p. 1914, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 700, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 822, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1312, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 1.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1, did not reenact and did not strike Code Section 45-9-80 in this article.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 45/HB 79, reserved the designation of this Code section, effective April 24, 2013.

45-9-81.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Commission” means the Georgia State Indemnification Commission.

“Department” means the Department of Administrative Services.

“Emergency management rescue specialist” means any person licensed as an emergency management rescue specialist pursuant to Code Section 38-3-36.

“Emergency medical technician” includes only persons who:

Are certified as emergency medical technicians, paramedics, or cardiac technicians under Chapter 11 of Title 31; and

Are employed in the capacity for which they are so certified by a department, agency, authority, or other instrumentality of state or local government.

“Firefighter” means any person who is employed as a professional firefighter on a full-time or part-time basis by any municipal, county, or state government fire department employing three or more firefighters and who has the responsibility of preventing and suppressing fires, protecting life and property, enforcing municipal, county, and state fire prevention codes, enforcing any law pertaining to the prevention and control of fires or who performs any acts or actions while on duty or when responding to a fire or emergency during any fire or other emergency or while performing duties intended to protect life and property.

“Firefighter” shall also mean any individual serving as an officially recognized or designated member of a legally organized volunteer fire department, or any employee of the State Forestry Commission whose job duties include fire mitigation, who performs any acts or actions while on duty or when responding to a fire or emergency during any fire or other emergency or while performing duties intended to protect life and property.

“Firefighter” shall also mean any individual employed by a person or corporation which has a contract with a municipal corporation or county to provide fire prevention and fire-fighting services to such municipal corporation or county and any such individual is employed on a full-time basis of at least 40 hours per week and has the responsibility of preventing and suppressing fires, protecting life and property, enforcing municipal or county fire prevention codes, enforcing any municipal or county ordinances pertaining to the prevention and control of fires or who performs any acts or actions while on duty or when responding to a fire or emergency during any fire or other emergency or while performing duties intended to protect life and property.

“In the line of duty” means:

With respect to an emergency medical technician or an emergency management rescue specialist, while on duty and when responding to or returning from an emergency or performing duties at the scene of an emergency or transporting a person to a medical facility for emergency treatment or returning therefrom;

With respect to a volunteer firefighter, while on duty and when responding to or returning from a fire or other emergency or performing duties during any fire or other emergency or performing duties intended to protect life and property including, without limitation, actual participation in a training exercise;

With respect to a law enforcement officer or firefighter, while on duty and performing services for and receiving compensation from the law enforcement and fire service agency which employs such officer or firefighter, while off duty when responding to any situation which would save a life or preserve the peace, or while preventing or attempting to prevent the commission of a crime or fire. A law enforcement officer or firefighter who is performing duties for and receiving compensation from a private employer at the time of such officer’s or firefighter’s death or bodily injury causing total permanent disability or partial permanent disability shall not be considered in the line of duty if the officer or firefighter is entitled to workers’ compensation benefits from the private employer or the private employer’s insurer;

With respect to a prison guard, while on duty and performing services for and receiving compensation from the public agency which employs such prison guard; or

With respect to a state highway employee, while on duty and performing any work necessary for the construction, maintenance, or operation of a roadway on or within the public roads of the state as defined in paragraph (24) of Code Section 32-1-3 when such employee is killed or permanently disabled as the result of working under hazardous conditions in close proximity to moving traffic or equipment.

Such term shall not mean commuting to or from work or commuting to or from training.

“Law enforcement officer” means any agent or officer of this state, a political subdivision or municipality of this state, or an authority of this state or a political subdivision of this state who, as a full-time or part-time employee, is vested either expressly by law or by virtue of public employment or service with authority to enforce the criminal or traffic laws with the power of arrest and whose duties include the preservation of public order, the protection of life and property, or the prevention, detection, or investigation of crime. Such term also includes the employees designated by the commissioner of juvenile justice pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (i) of Code Section 49-4A-8 who have the duty to investigate and apprehend delinquent children, or the supervision of delinquent children under intensive supervision in the community, and any child with a pending juvenile court case alleging the child to be a child in need of services who has escaped from a facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Juvenile Justice or who has broken the conditions of supervision. Such term also includes members of the Georgia National Guard and the State Defense Force, the composition of which is set forth in Code Section 38-2-3, who have been called into active state service by the Governor.

“Organic brain damage” means direct physical trauma to the brain which so affects the mental capacity as to preclude function productively in any employment.

“Partial permanent disability” means disability due to:

Loss of the use of one eye or blindness in one eye with only light perception;

Loss of one hand;

Loss of one leg; or

Loss of a lower extremity or the residual effect of an organic disease or injury which so affects the functions of balance or propulsion as to preclude locomotion without the use of a wheelchair for all but very short distances.

“Prison guard” means any person employed by the state or any political subdivision thereof whose principal duties relate to the supervision and incarceration of persons accused or convicted of the violation of the criminal laws of this state or any political subdivision thereof. Such term shall also mean any community supervision officer who is required to be certified under Chapter 8 of Title 35, the “Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Act,” and whose principal duties directly relate to the supervision of probationers or parolees. Such term also means any person employed by the state or any political subdivision thereof whose principal duties include the supervision of youth who are charged with or adjudicated for an act which if committed by adults would be considered a crime.

“State highway employee” means an employee of the Georgia Department of Transportation who receives compensation directly therefrom and regularly engages in duties necessary for the construction, maintenance, or operation of roadways on or within the public roads of this state as defined in paragraph (24) of Code Section 32-1-3.

“Total permanent disability” means disability due to:

Loss of both eyes or blindness in both eyes with only light perception;

Loss or loss of use of both hands;

Loss or loss of use of both legs;

Loss of a lower extremity or the residual effect of an organic disease or injury which so affects the functions of balance or propulsion as to preclude locomotion without resort to a wheelchair at all times; or

Organic brain damage.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1914, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 700, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 477, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 651, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1303, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1469, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 762, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1478, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 822, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1923, § 10; Ga. L. 1990, p. 488, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 646, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 771, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1312, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 22; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1149, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 877, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 950, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 264, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 12-10; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 27-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 45/SB 46; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 45/HB 79; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 4-50/HB 242; Ga. L. 2014, p. 382, § 2/SB 324; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-95/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 846, § 45/HB 737; Ga. L. 2021, p. 322, § 1/HB 106.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, inserted “, or the supervision of delinquent children under intensive supervision in the community,” in the middle of the second sentence of paragraph (7).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the second sentence of paragraph (10), substituted “community supervision officer” for “probation supervisor or parole officer” near the beginning and substituted “supervision of probationers or parolees” for “supervision of adult probationers or adult parolees” at the end.

The 2016 amendment,

effective May 3, 2016, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised language in the second sentence of paragraph (10).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and the State Defense Force” in the last sentence of paragraph (7).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 822, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “If any provision of this Act [which amended Code Sections 45-9-80 through 45-9-83, 45-9-84.2, 45-9-85, and 45-9-86] is held to be invalid or inoperative for any reason, the remaining provisions of this Act shall be deemed to be void and of no effect it being the legislative intent that this Act as a whole would not have been adopted had any provision not been included.”

Ga. L. 2000, p.
283, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the first 2000 amendment became effective July 1, 2001, only upon ratification of a constitutional amendment by the voters at the November 2000 general election. The constitutional amendment (Ga. L. 2000, p. 1999) was approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting at the general election held on November 7, 2000.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 13-1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the second 2000 Act which amended this Code section became fully effective July 1, 2001, but authorized administrative action commencing April 28, 2000, for purposes of appointing certain officials, adopting rules and regulations, employing personnel, and preparing for and phasing in full implementation; provided, however, that the Governor may by executive order extend the date for full implementation of the Act to no later than July 1, 2003. In accordance with an executive order issued June 29, 2001, by the Governor, the amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, became fully effective July 1, 2001.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

45-9-82.
Establishment of indemnification program.

There is established a program to provide for indemnification with respect to the:

Death of any law enforcement officer, firefighter, or prison guard who is or has been killed in the line of duty subsequent to January 1, 1973;

Permanent disability of any law enforcement officer, firefighter, or prison guard who is or has been permanently disabled in the line of duty subsequent to January 1, 1973;

Death or permanent disability of any emergency medical technician who is killed or permanently disabled or who has been killed or permanently disabled in the line of duty subsequent to January 1, 1977;

Death or permanent disability of any emergency management rescue specialist who is killed or permanently disabled on or after January 1, 1991; and

Death or permanent disability of any state highway employee who is killed or permanently disabled in the line of duty on or after January 1, 1990.

Such program shall be administered by the department, subject to review by the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1914, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 700, § 3; Ga. L. 1987, p. 822, § 3; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1312, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4(16); Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, §§ 4, 11(16); Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 822, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “If any provision of this Act [which amended Code Sections 45-9-80 through 45-9-83, 45-9-84.2, 45-9-85, and 45-9-86] is held to be invalid or inoperative for any reason, the remaining provisions of this Act shall be deemed to be void and of no effect it being the legislative intent that this Act as a whole would not have been adopted had any provision not been included.”

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

45-9-83.
Indemnification commission created; composition; assignment to Department of Administrative Services for administrative purposes; meetings.

There is created the Georgia State Indemnification Commission which shall be composed of the Governor, the executive director of the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, the executive director of the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council, the commissioner of public safety, the commissioner of transportation, the commissioner of corrections, the commissioner of community supervision, the commissioner of public health, one law enforcement officer who shall be a member of the Peace Officers’ Association of Georgia appointed by the Governor from a list of five candidates provided by such organization, and one firefighter who shall be a member of the Georgia State Firemen’s Association appointed by the Governor from a list of five candidates provided by such organization. The Governor shall be the chairperson of the commission, and the commission shall be assigned to the department for administrative purposes. The commission shall meet at least semiannually upon the call of the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1914, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 762, § 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 45; Ga. L. 1987, p. 822, § 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 45; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 5; Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-5/HB 214; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-96/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in this Code section, inserted “the commissioner of community supervision,” near the middle of the first sentence, and inserted a comma following “chairperson of the commission” in the second sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 822, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “If any provision of this Act [which amended Code Sections 45-9-80 through 45-9-83, 45-9-84.2, 45-9-85, and 45-9-86] is held to be invalid or inoperative for any reason, the remaining provisions of this Act shall be deemed to be void and of no effect it being the legislative intent that this Act as a whole would not have been adopted had any provision not been included.”

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

45-9-84.
Appeals of department decisions; use of personnel and resources of other agencies.

The commission is authorized to consider appeals of decisions of the department to correct errors made by the department in approving or denying any claim filed pursuant to this article. The commission may modify or override the decision of the department upon a showing of an error of material fact or an abuse of discretion. The department and the commission shall be authorized to contact other state agencies for the purpose of using the personnel and resources of such agencies to assist the commission in carrying out its duties.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1914, § 6; Ga. L. 1981, p. 477, § 3; Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

45-9-84.1.
Georgia State Indemnification Fund — Creation; administration; investment fund paid over to Office of the State Treasurer.

There is created a fund to be known as the Georgia State Indemnification Fund. The custodian of the Georgia State Indemnification Fund shall be the department. The department shall administer the Georgia State Indemnification Fund and shall approve or deny claims for compensation filed pursuant to this article; provided, however, that any decision of the department shall be subject to review by the commission as provided in Code Section 45-9-84. Any amounts held by the Georgia State Indemnification Fund which are available for investment shall be paid over to the Office of the State Treasurer. The state treasurer shall deposit such funds in a trust account for credit only to the Georgia State Indemnification Fund. The state treasurer shall invest such funds subject to the limitations of Code Section 50-5A-7 and Chapter 17 of Title 50. All income derived from such investments shall accrue to the Georgia State Indemnification Fund. When moneys are paid over to the Office of the State Treasurer, as provided in this Code section, the commissioner shall submit an estimate of the date such funds shall no longer be available for investment. When the commissioner wishes to withdraw funds from the trust account provided for in this Code section, he or she shall submit a request for such withdrawal, in writing, to the state treasurer.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 477, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 19; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1474, § 6; Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, §§ 2, 3/SB 296.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

45-9-84.2.
Georgia State Indemnification Fund — Authorization for appropriation of moneys to the fund; moneys from other sources.

The General Assembly is authorized to appropriate funds to be placed in the Georgia State Indemnification Fund for the purpose of providing for indemnification with respect to the death or disability of any law enforcement officer, firefighter, or prison guard who is or has been killed or permanently disabled in the line of duty subsequent to January 1, 1973, the death or disability of any emergency medical technician who is killed or permanently disabled or has been killed or permanently disabled in the line of duty subsequent to January 1, 1977, the death or disability of any emergency management rescue specialist who is killed or permanently disabled on or after January 1, 1991, and the death or disability of any state highway employee who is or has been killed or permanently disabled in the line of duty subsequent to January 1, 1990, as well as defraying the expenses and costs incurred by the department and the commission in the administration of this part. In addition, the department is authorized to accept for deposit in the Georgia State Indemnification Fund any other funds from any other source. All funds appropriated to the Georgia State Indemnification Fund shall be presumptively concluded to have been committed to the purpose for which they have been appropriated and shall not lapse.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 477, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 822, § 5; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1312, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 19; Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4(17); Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, §§ 6, 11(17); Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 822, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “If any provision of this Act [which amended Code Sections 45-9-80 through 45-9-83, 45-9-84.2, 45-9-85, and 45-9-86] is held to be invalid or inoperative for any reason, the remaining provisions of this Act shall be deemed to be void and of no effect it being the legislative intent that this Act as a whole would not have been adopted had any provision not been included.”

Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 2000 amendment became effective July 1, 2001, only upon ratification of a constitutional amendment by the voters at the November 2000 general election. The constitutional amendment (Ga. L. 2000, p. 1999) was approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting at the general election held on November 7, 2000.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

45-9-84.3.
Georgia State Indemnification Fund — Authority of department as to payments from fund.

The department is authorized, subject to the limitations contained in this part:

To pay the appropriate indemnification to the persons eligible for indemnification under this part from the proceeds of the Georgia State Indemnification Fund;

To make such payments as may be necessary to defray the expenses and costs incurred by the department and the commission in administering this part; and

With the approval of the commission, to utilize the resources of the Georgia State Indemnification Fund to purchase insurance to provide for such indemnification.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 477, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 19; Ga. L. 1995, p. 877, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 2000 amendment became effective July 1, 2001, only upon ratification of a constitutional amendment by the voters at the November 2000 general election. The constitutional amendment (Ga. L. 2000, p. 1999) was approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting at the general election held on November 7, 2000.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

45-9-85.
Payment of indemnification for death or disability; procedure for making payments; appeal.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity” means actions that are not clerical, administrative, or nonmanual in nature.

“Public safety officer” means a law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician, emergency management rescue specialist, state highway employee, or prison guard.

“Work related activity” means, while in the line of duty:

Engaging in a situation involving nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity related to law enforcement, fire suppression, rescue, hazardous material response, emergency medical services, prison or jail security, disaster relief, or any other emergency response as classified by the commission; or

Participating in a training exercise involving nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity.

Indemnification shall be paid under this article as follows:

In the case of a partial permanent disability suffered in the line of duty by a public safety officer, the eligible disabled person may elect payment of $35,000.00 paid in equal monthly installments for five years or a lump sum of such amount reduced to its present value upon the basis of interest calculated at the rate of 6 percent per annum;

In the case of a total permanent disability suffered in the line of duty by a public safety officer, the injured person may elect to receive a payment of $75,000.00 paid in equal monthly installments for five years or a lump sum of such amount reduced to its present value upon the basis of interest calculated at the rate of 6 percent per annum;

In the case of death suffered in the line of duty by a public safety officer, payment shall be made to:

The surviving unremarried spouse;

The surviving children who are under the age of 19 or, if a student enrolled in an institution of postsecondary education at the time of such death, under the age of 24; or

Individuals not otherwise provided for under this subparagraph who are the dependents of the spouse or deceased person as shown in the spouse’s or deceased person’s most recent tax return.

In the case of organic brain damage suffered in the line of duty by a law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician, emergency management specialist, state highway employee, or prison guard, payment shall be made to the legal guardian of the organically brain damaged person.

The surviving unremarried spouse, dependents, or the legal guardian may elect to receive payment in a lump sum payment of $150,000.00 paid in equal monthly installments for five years or a lump sum of such amount reduced to its present value upon the basis of interest calculated at the rate of 6 percent per annum; or

A heart attack, stroke, or vascular rupture suffered by a public safety officer shall be presumed to qualify such public safety officer under this subsection if the heart attack, stroke, or vascular rupture:

Commenced:

While such public safety officer was performing work related activity;

While such public safety officer was on duty after performing work related activity; or

Not later than 24 hours after performing work related activity; and

Directly or proximately resulted in the death or partial or permanent disability of the public safety officer, unless competent medical evidence established that the heart attack, stroke, or vascular rupture was not related to the work related activity or was directly or proximately caused by something other than the mere presence of cardiovascular disease risk factors.

After the department, or the commission upon review of a denial by the department, determines that a public safety officer has suffered a total permanent disability, a partial permanent disability, organic brain damage, or death in the line of duty, the department shall be authorized to make the appropriate payments as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.

If the department denies a claim, any person seeking benefits pursuant to this part may appeal the department’s decision to the commission. Any such appeal shall be filed with the commission within 60 days of receipt of the department’s decision and shall identify the errors in the department’s decision. Appeals shall be considered by the commission at the commission’s semiannual meeting as provided in Code Section 45-9-84.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1914, § 5; Ga. L. 1980, p. 700, § 4; Ga. L. 1987, p. 822, § 6; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1312, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 19; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 45; Ga. L. 1995, p. 877, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4(18); Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, §§ 7, 11(18); Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254; Ga. L. 2011, p. 593, § 1.1/HB 156; Ga. L. 2017, p. 500, § 4-1/SB 160; Ga. L. 2020, p. 49, § 1/HB 1017; Ga. L. 2021, p. 314, § 1/SB 60.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “$150,000.00” for “$100,000.00” in the last sentence of paragraph (a)(3).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, rewrote paragraph (a)(3). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added subsection (a); redesignated former subsection (a) as present subsection (b); substituted “public safety officer” for “law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician, emergency management rescue specialist, state highway employee, or prison guard” in paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(2); substituted “public safety officer” for “law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician, emergency management specialist, state highway employee, or prison guard” in subparagraph (b)(3)(A); substituted “; or” for a period at the end of subparagraph (b)(3)(C); added paragraph (b)(4); redesignated former subsections (b) and (c) as present subsections (c) and (d), respectively; and substituted “public safety officer” for “law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician, emergency management rescue specialist, prison guard, or state highway employee” in subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 822, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “If any provision of this Act [which amended Code Sections 45-9-80 through 45-9-83, 45-9-84.2, 45-9-85, and 45-9-86] is held to be invalid or inoperative for any reason, the remaining provisions of this Act shall be deemed to be void and of no effect it being the legislative intent that this Act as a whole would not have been adopted had any provision not been included.”

Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 2000 amendment became effective July 1, 2001, only upon ratification of a constitutional amendment by the voters at the November 2000 general election. The constitutional amendment (Ga. L. 2000, p. 1999) was approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting at the general election held on November 7, 2000.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 593, § 2/HB 156, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the revised indemnification amounts for state highway employees shall be applicable to all incidents involving state highway employees occurring on or after January 1, 2011.

“(b) The retroactive application of these changes with regard to state highway employees is based on the authority of Ga. Laws 2000, p. 2007, Section 1, adding Article III, Section VI, Paragraph VI(g) of the Georgia Constitution.”

Ga. L. 2017, p. 500, § 1-1/SB 160, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Back the Badge Act of 2017.’ ”

Ga. L. 2020, p. 49, § 2/HB 1017, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall apply to claims regarding any incident giving rise to a death occurring on or after August 1, 2016.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey on criminal law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 73 (2017).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 89 (2017).

45-9-86.
Application for indemnification.

An application for indemnification with respect to a claim for total permanent disability or partial permanent disability of a law enforcement officer, firefighter, prison guard, emergency medical technician, emergency management rescue specialist, or state highway employee shall be submitted by that person unless the person is mentally incompetent, in which case the application may be made on such person’s behalf by his or her legal guardian.

An application for indemnification with respect to a claim for the death of a law enforcement officer, firefighter, prison guard, emergency medical technician, emergency management rescue specialist, or state highway employee shall be submitted by or on behalf of the surviving unremarried spouse or dependents eligible under this part.

An application for indemnification with respect to death, organic brain damage, total permanent disability, or partial permanent disability must be made within 24 months after the date of the incident giving rise to the death, organic brain damage, or disability.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1914, § 7; Ga. L. 1980, p. 700, § 5; Ga. L. 1981, p. 477, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 413, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 822, § 7; Ga. L. 1991, p. 771, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1312, § 6; Ga. L. 1995, p. 877, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4(19); Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, §§ 8, 11(19); Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 822, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “If any provision of this Act [which amended Code Sections 45-9-80 through 45-9-83, 45-9-84.2, 45-9-85, and 45-9-86] is held to be invalid or inoperative for any reason, the remaining provisions of this Act shall be deemed to be void and of no effect it being the legislative intent that this Act as a whole would not have been adopted had any provision not been included.”

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

45-9-86.1 and 45-9-86.2.
[Repealed]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254, effective July 1, 2008.

Editor’s notes.

These Code sections, concerning the time limit on applications for indemnification relative to death of part-time law enforcement officer killed in line of duty and the time limitation on applications for indemnification relative to law enforcement officers, firefighters, and prison guards permanently disabled due to organic brain damage, were based on Ga. L. 1981, p. 477, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 651, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4(20); Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 11(20).

45-9-87.
Indemnification not taxable.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that indemnification paid pursuant to this part shall not be taxable within this state for any purpose.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1343, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 1; Code 1981, §

45-9-87

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 2000 amendment became effective July 1, 2001, only upon ratification of a constitutional amendment by the voters at the November 2000 general election. The constitutional amendment (Ga. L. 2000, p. 1999) was approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting at the general election held on November 7, 2000.

This Code section formerly pertained to the state’s subrogration to cause of action for death or disability upon payment of indemnification. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1978, p. 1914, § 9; Ga. L. 1980, p. 700, § 6.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

45-9-88.
Indemnification not to be awarded when penal violation, suicide, intentionally self-inflicted injuries, natural causes, or performance of certain routine duties caused or contributed to death or disability.

No indemnification shall be awarded to any person otherwise entitled thereto who violates a penal law of this state which violation caused or contributed to the death or disability of the officer.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, no payment shall be authorized if death, organic brain damage, total permanent disability, or partial permanent disability occurs from suicide, intentionally self-inflicted injuries, natural causes, or the performance of routine duties which would not be considered strenuous or dangerous by a reasonable person, except as provided for in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-9-85.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1914, § 8; Code 1981, §

45-9-88

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254; Ga. L. 2021, p. 314, § 2/SB 60.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “, except as provided for in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-9-85” for “; provided, however, that this subsection shall not preclude the department or the commission from considering competent, independent medical evidence as to whether a heart attack that occurs shortly after fighting a fire was caused by the strain of fighting the fire” at the end of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

45-9-89.
Annual report to General Assembly.

The commission shall annually file a report of its activities with the General Assembly, which report shall include the amount of funds paid under the program of indemnification. It shall also include a copy of each order providing for payment or a summary of each such order giving all pertinent details.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1914, § 10; Code 1981, §

45-9-89

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.